Tennessee, session 114, SB0834.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
The Tennessee higher education commission, in consultation with the
department of finance and administration, shall create and submit a report to the
members of the general assembly detailing the state appropriations made to each land
grant institution in this state from 1987 to 2020, on a per pupil basis. The report must be
submitted to the members of the general assembly by December 31, 2025.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0834
000569
- 1 -